North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 2. Nursing Home Patients’ Bill of Rights.

§ 131E-115.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to promote the interests and well-being of the patients in nursing homes and adult care homes licensed pursuant to

G.S. 131E-102

, and patients in a nursing home operated by a hospital which is licensed under Article 5 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes. It is the intent of the General Assembly that every patient’s civil and religious liberties, including the right to independent personal decisions and knowledge of available choices, shall not be infringed and that the facility shall encourage and assist the patient in the fullest possible exercise of these rights.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 143, s. 2; c. 775, ss. 1, 6; 1995, c. 509, s. 72; c. 535, s. 25.

§ 131E-116.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, unless otherwise specified:

“Administrator” means an administrator of a facility.

(1a)

“Commission” means the North Carolina Medical Care Commission.

“Facility” means a nursing home and a home for the aged or disabled licensed pursuant to

G.S. 131E-102

, and also means a nursing home operated by a hospital which is licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E.

“Patient” means a person who has been admitted to a facility.

“Representative payee” means a person certified by the federal government to receive and disburse benefits for a recipient of governmental assistance.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 143, s. 1; c. 775, ss. 1, 6; 1993, c. 499, s. 1.

§ 131E-117.
Declaration of patient’s rights.

All facilities shall treat their patients in accordance with the provisions of this Part. Every patient shall have the following rights:

To be treated with consideration, respect, and full recognition of personal dignity and individuality;

To receive care, treatment and services which are adequate, appropriate, and in compliance with relevant federal and State statutes and rules;

To receive at the time of admission and during the stay, a written statement of the services provided by the facility, including those required to be offered on an as-needed basis, and of related charges. Charges for services not covered under Medicare or Medicaid shall be specified. Upon receiving this statement, the patient shall sign a written receipt which must be on file in the facility and available for inspection;

To have on file in the patient’s record a written or verbal order of the attending physician containing any information as the attending physician deems appropriate or necessary, together with the proposed schedule of medical treatment. The patient shall give prior informed consent to participation in experimental research. Written evidence of compliance with this subdivision, including signed acknowledgements by the patient, shall be retained by the facility in the patient’s file;

To receive respect and privacy in the patient’s medical care program. Case discussion, consultation, examination, and treatment shall remain confidential and shall be conducted discreetly. Personal and medical records shall be confidential and the written consent of the patient shall be obtained for their release to any individual, other than family members, except as needed in case of the patient’s transfer to another health care institution or as required by law or third party payment contract;

To be free from mental and physical abuse and, except in emergencies, to be free from chemical and physical restraints unless authorized for a specified period of time by a physician according to clear and indicated medical need;

To receive from the administrator or staff of the facility a reasonable response to all requests;

To associate and communicate privately and without restriction with persons and groups of the patient’s choice on the patient’s initiative or that of the persons or groups at any reasonable hour; to send and receive mail promptly and unopened, unless the patient is unable to open and read personal mail; to have access at any reasonable hour to a telephone where the patient may speak privately; and to have access to writing instruments, stationery, and postage;

To manage the patient’s financial affairs unless authority has been delegated to another pursuant to a power of attorney, or written agreement, or some other person or agency has been appointed for this purpose pursuant to law. Nothing shall prevent the patient and facility from entering a written agreement for the facility to manage the patient’s financial affairs. In the event that the facility manages the patient’s financial affairs, it shall have an accounting available for inspection and shall furnish the patient with a quarterly statement of the patient’s account. The patient shall have reasonable access to this account at reasonable hours; the patient or facility may terminate the agreement for the facility to manage the patient’s financial affairs at any time upon five days’ notice.

To enjoy privacy in visits by the patient’s spouse, and, if both are inpatients of the facility, they shall be afforded the opportunity where feasible to share a room;

To enjoy privacy in the patient’s room;

To present grievances and recommend changes in policies and services, personally or through other persons or in combination with others, on the patient’s personal behalf or that of others to the facility’s staff, the community advisory committee, the administrator, the Department, or other persons or groups without fear of reprisal, restraint, interference, coercion, or discrimination;

To not be required to perform services for the facility without personal consent and the written approval of the attending physician;

To retain, to secure storage for, and to use personal clothing and possessions, where reasonable;

To not be transferred or discharged from a facility except for medical reasons, the patient’s own or other patients’ welfare, nonpayment for the stay, or when the transfer or discharge is mandated under Title XVIII (Medicare) or Title XIX (Medicaid) of the Social Security Act. The patient shall be given at least five days’ advance notice to ensure orderly transfer or discharge, unless the attending physician orders immediate transfer, and these actions, and the reasons for them, shall be documented in the patient’s medical record;

To be notified within 10 days after the facility has been issued a provisional license because of violation of licensure regulations or received notice of revocation of license by the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services and the basis on which the provisional license or notice of revocation of license was issued. The patient’s responsible family member or guardian shall also be notified.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1989, c. 75; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Nurse Malpractice in North Carolina: The Standard of Care,” see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 579 (1987).

§ 131E-118.
Transfer of management responsibilities.

The patient’s representative who has been given the power in writing by the patient to manage the patient’s financial affairs or the patient’s legal guardian as appointed by a court or the patient’s attorney-in-fact as specified in the power of attorney agreement may sign any documents required by the provisions of this Part, may perform any other act, and may receive or furnish any information required by this Part.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-119.
No waiver of rights.

No facility may require a patient to waive the rights specified in this Part.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-120.
Notice to patient.

A copy of

G.S. 131E-115

through

G.S. 131E-127

shall be posted conspicuously in a public place in all facilities. Copies of

G.S. 131E-115

through

G.S. 131E-127

shall be furnished to the patient upon admittance to the facility, to all patients currently residing in the facility, to the sponsoring agency, to a representative payee of the patient, or to any person designated in

G.S. 131E-118

, and to the patient’s next of kin, if requested. Receipts for the statement signed by these persons shall be retained in the facility’s files.

The address and telephone number of the section in the Department responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this Part shall be posted and distributed with copies of the Part. The address and telephone number of the county social services department shall also be posted and distributed.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-121.
Responsibility of administrator.

Responsibility for implementing the provisions of this Part shall rest on the administrator of the facility.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-122.
Staff training.

Each facility shall provide appropriate staff training to implement each patient’s rights included in this Part.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-123.
Civil action.

Every patient shall have the right to institute a civil action for injunctive relief to enforce the provisions of this Part. The Department, a general guardian, or any person appointed as guardian ad litem pursuant to law, may institute an action pursuant to this section on behalf of the patient or patients. Any agency or person named above may enforce the rights of the patient specified in this Part which the patient is unable to personally enforce.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-124.
Enforcement and investigation; confidentiality.

The Department shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this Part. The Department shall investigate complaints made to it and reply within a reasonable time, not to exceed 60 days, upon receipt of a complaint.

(a1)

When the Department receives a complaint alleging a violation of the provisions of this Part pertaining to patient care or patient safety, the Department shall initiate an investigation as follows:

Immediately upon receipt of the complaint if the complaint alleges a life-threatening situation.

Within 24 hours if the complaint alleges abuse of a resident as defined by

G.S. 131D-20(1)

.

Within 48 hours if the complaint alleges neglect of a resident as defined by

G.S. 131D-20(8)

.

Within two weeks in all other situations.

The investigation shall be completed within 30 days. The requirements of this section are in addition to and not in lieu of any investigatory requirements for adult protective services pursuant to Article 6 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes.

The Department is authorized to inspect patients’ medical records maintained at the facility when necessary to investigate any alleged violation of this Part.

The Department shall maintain the confidentiality of all persons who register complaints with the Department and of all medical records inspected by the Department. A person who has filed a complaint shall have access to information about a complaint investigation involving a specific resident if written authorization is obtained from the resident, legal representative, or responsible party. The designation of the responsible party shall be maintained by the nursing facility in the resident’s medical record.

Pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1395 and

G.S. 131E-127

, a nursing home as defined in G.S. 131E-101(6), is not in violation of any applicable statute, rule, or regulation for any action taken pursuant to a physician’s order when the physician has determined that the action is medically necessary.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1999-113, s. 3; 1999-334, s. 1.9.

§ 131E-125.
Revocation of a license.

The Department shall have the authority to revoke a license issued pursuant to

G.S. 131E-102

in any case where it finds that there has been a substantial failure to comply with the provisions of this Part or any failure that endangers the health, safety or welfare of patients.A revocation shall be effected by mailing to the licensee by registered mail, or by personal service of, a notice setting forth the particular reasons for such action. Such revocation shall become effective 20 days after the mailing or service of the notice, unless the applicant or licensee, within such 20-day period, files a petition for a contested case, in which case the notice shall be deemed to be suspended. At any time at or prior to the hearing, the Department may rescind the notice of revocation upon being satisfied that the reasons for the revocation have been or will be removed.

In the case of a nursing home operated by a hospital which is licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, when the Department of Health and Human Services finds that there has been a substantial failure to comply with the provisions of this Part, it may issue an order preventing the continued operation of the home.Such order shall be effected by mailing to the hospital by registered or certified mail, or by personal service of, a notice setting forth the particular reasons for such action. Such order shall become effective 20 days after the mailing of the notice, unless the hospital, within such 20-day period, files a petition for a contested case, in which case the order shall be deemed to be suspended. At any time at or prior to the hearing, the Department of Health and Human Services may rescind the order upon being satisfied that the reasons for the order have been or will be removed.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 143, s. 3; c. 775, ss. 1, 6; 1987, c. 827, s. 251; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 131E-126.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 600, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to present provisions relating to penalties, see

G.S. 131E-129

.

§ 131E-127.
No interference with practice of medicine or physician-patient relationship.

Nothing in this Part shall be construed to interfere with the practice of medicine or the physician-patient relationship.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-128.
Nursing home advisory committees.

It is the purpose of the General Assembly that community advisory committee members function as representatives of the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman and through their designation work to maintain the intent of the Nursing Home Resident’s Bill of Rights within the nursing homes in this State, including nursing homes operated by hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E. It is the further purpose of the General Assembly that the committees promote community involvement and cooperation with nursing homes and an integration of these homes into a system of care for the elderly.

A community advisory committee shall be established in each county which has a nursing home, including a nursing home operated by a hospital licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, shall serve all the homes in the county, and shall work with each home in the best interest of the persons residing in each home. In a county which has one, two, or three nursing homes, the committee shall have five members. In a county with four or more nursing homes, the committee shall have one additional member for each nursing home in excess of three, and may have up to five additional members per committee at the discretion of the county commissioners.

In each county with four or more nursing homes, the committee shall establish a subcommittee of no more than five members and no fewer than three members from the committee for each nursing home in the county. Each member must serve on at least one subcommittee.

Boards of county commissioners are encouraged to appoint the Nursing Home Community Advisory Committees. Of the members, a minority (not less than one-third, but as close to one-third as possible) must be chosen from among persons nominated by a majority of the chief administrators of nursing homes in the county and of the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes. If the nursing home administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes fail to make a nomination within 45 days after written notification has been sent to them by the board of county commissioners requesting a nomination, these appointments may be made by the board of county commissioners without nominations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, appointment to a nursing home community advisory committee is contingent upon designation of the appointee by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman in accordance with G.S. 143B-181.18. A designated appointee is directly accountable to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program in order to perform the duties as a representative of the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman. Removal of the appointee’s designation by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman automatically rescinds the appointment to the nursing home community advisory committee.

Any individual who serves as a community advisory committee member must go through the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman’s certification and designation process and meet the certification and designation requirements in accordance with the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program Policies and Procedures.

Each committee member shall serve an initial term of one year. Any person reappointed to a second or subsequent term in the same county shall serve a three-year term. Persons who were originally nominees of nursing home chief administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes, or who were appointed by the board of county commissioners when the nursing home administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes failed to make nominations, may not be reappointed without the consent of a majority of the nursing home chief administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes within the county. If the nursing home chief administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes fail to approve or reject the reappointment within 45 days of being requested by the board of county commissioners, the commissioners may reappoint the member if they so choose.

Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment of a person for a one-year term. Any person replacing a member nominated by the chief administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes or a person appointed when the chief administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes failed to make a nomination shall be selected from among persons nominated by the administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes, as provided in subsection (b). If the county commissioners fail to appoint members to a committee, or fail to fill a vacancy, the appointment shall be made or vacancy filled by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman no sooner than 45 days after the commissioners have been notified of the appointment or vacancy if nomination or approval of the nursing home administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes is not required. If nominations or approval of the nursing home administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes is required, the appointment shall be made or vacancy filled by the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman no sooner than 45 days after the commissioners have received the nomination or approval, or no sooner than 45 days after the 45-day period for action by the nursing home administrators and the governing bodies of the hospitals licensed under Article 5 of G.S. Chapter 131E, which operate nursing homes.

The committee shall elect from its members a chair, to serve a one-year term.

Each member must be a resident of the county which the committee serves. No person or immediate family member of a person with a financial interest in a home served by a committee, or employee or governing board member or immediate family member of an employee or governing board member of a home served by a committee, or immediate family member of a patient in a home served by a committee may be a member of a committee. Membership on a committee shall not be considered an office as defined in

G.S. 128-1

or

G.S. 128-1

.1. Any county commissioner who is appointed to the committee shall be deemed to be serving on the committee in an ex officio capacity. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for the amount of actual expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties. The names of the committee members and the date of expiration of their terms shall be filed with the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, which shall supply a copy to the Division of Health Service Regulation.

The Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman shall develop training requirements for certification and designation in accordance with 45 C.F.R. § 1324.13(c)(2). Each committee member must receive certification training as specified by the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program Policies and Procedures and be designated as representatives of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program prior to exercising any power under subsection (h) of this section. The State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program shall provide the committees with information, guidelines, training, and consultation to direct them in the performance of their duties.

Each committee shall apprise itself of the general conditions under which the persons are residing in the homes, and shall work for the best interests of the persons in the homes. This may include assisting persons who have grievances with the home and facilitating the resolution of grievances at the local level.

Each committee shall quarterly visit the nursing home it serves. For each official quarterly visit, a majority of the committee members shall be present. In addition, each committee may visit the nursing home it serves whenever it deems it necessary to carry out its duties. In counties with four or more nursing homes, the subcommittee assigned to a home shall perform the duties of the committee under this subdivision, and a majority of the subcommittee members must be present for any visit.

Each member of a committee shall have the right to enter into the facility the committee serves in order to carry out the members’ responsibilities. In a county where subcommittees have been established, this right of access shall be limited to homes served by those subcommittees to which the member has been appointed.

The committee or subcommittee may communicate through its chair with the Department or any other agency in relation to the interest of any patient. The identity of any complainant or resident involved in a complaint shall not be disclosed except as permitted under the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.

Each home shall cooperate with the committee as it carries out its duties.

Before entering into any nursing home, the committee, subcommittee, or member shall identify itself to the person present at the facility who is in charge of the facility at that time.

Any written communication made by a member of a nursing home advisory committee within the course and scope of the member’s duties, as specified in

G.S. 131E-128

, shall be privileged to the extent provided in this subsection. All communication shall be considered the property of the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman and subject to the Office’s disclosure policies. This privilege shall be a defense in a cause of action for libel if the member was acting in good faith and the statements or communications do not amount to intentional wrongdoing.To the extent that any nursing home advisory committee or any member thereof is covered by liability insurance, that committee or member shall be deemed to have waived the qualified immunity herein to the extent of indemnification by insurance.

History.

1977, c. 897, s. 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1192, s. 1; 1983, c. 143, ss. 4-9; c. 775, ss. 1, 6; 1987, c. 682, s. 1; 1995, c. 254, s. 7; 1997-176, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2007-182, s. 1; 2017-103, s. 1(b).

§ 131E-128.1.
Nursing home medication management advisory committee.

Definitions. — As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, the term:

“Advisory committee” means a medication management committee established under this section to advise the quality assurance committee.

“Medication-related error” means any preventable medication-related event that adversely affects a patient in a nursing home and that is related to professional practice, or health care products, procedures, and systems, including prescribing, prescription order communications, product labeling, packaging and nomenclature, compounding, dispensing, distribution, administration, education, monitoring, and use.

“Nursing home” means a nursing home licensed under this Chapter and includes an adult care home operated as part of a nursing home.

“Potential medication-related error” means a medication-related error that has not yet adversely affected a patient in a nursing home, but that has the potential to if not anticipated or prevented or if left unnoticed.

“Quality assurance committee” means a committee established in a nursing home in accordance with federal and State regulations to identify circumstances requiring quality assessment and assurance activities and to develop and implement appropriate plans of action to correct deficiencies in quality of care.

Purpose. — It is the purpose of the General Assembly to enhance compliance with this Part through the establishment of medication management advisory committees in nursing homes. The purpose of these committees is to assist nursing homes to identify medication-related errors, evaluate the causes of those errors, and take appropriate actions to ensure the safe prescribing, dispensing, and administration of medications to nursing home patients.

Advisory Committee Established; Membership. — Every nursing home shall establish a medication management advisory committee to advise the quality assurance committee on quality of care issues related to pharmaceutical and medication management and use in the nursing home. The nursing home shall maintain the advisory committee as part of its administrative duties. The advisory committee shall be interdisciplinary and consist of the nursing home administrator and at least the following members appointed by the nursing home administrator:

The director of nursing.

The consultant pharmacist.

A physician designated by the nursing home administrator.

At least three other members of the nursing home staff.

Meetings. — The advisory committee shall meet as needed but not less frequently than quarterly. The Director of Nursing or Staff Development Coordinator shall chair the advisory committee. The nursing home administrator shall ensure that a record is maintained of each meeting.

Confidentiality. — The meetings or proceedings of the advisory committee, the records and materials it produces, and the materials it considers, including analyses and reports pertaining to medication-related error reporting under

G.S. 131E-128.2

and pharmacy reports on drug defects and adverse reactions under

G.S. 131E-128.4

, shall be confidential and not be considered public records within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

. The meetings or proceedings and records and materials also shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action against a nursing home or a provider of professional health services resulting from matters that are the subject of evaluation and review by the committee. No person who was in attendance at a meeting of the committee shall testify in any civil action as to any evidence or other matters produced or presented during the meetings or proceedings of the committee or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of the committee or its members. Notwithstanding the foregoing:

Information, documents, or records otherwise available, including any deficiencies found in the course of an inspection conducted under

G.S. 131E-105

, shall not be immune from discovery or use in a civil action merely because they were presented during meetings or proceedings of the advisory committee. A member of the advisory committee or a person who testifies before the committee may testify in a civil action but cannot be asked about that person’s testimony before the committee or any opinion formed as a result of the committee meetings or proceedings.

Information that is confidential and not subject to discovery or use in civil actions under this subsection may be released to a professional standards review organization that performs any accreditation or certification function. Information released to the professional standards review organization shall be limited to information reasonably necessary and relevant to the standards review organization’s determination to grant or continue accreditation or certification. Information released to the standards review organization retains its confidentiality and is not subject to discovery or use in any civil action as provided under this subsection. The standards review organization shall keep the information confidential subject to this subsection.

Information that is confidential and not subject to discovery or use in civil actions under this subsection may be released to the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to its investigative authority under

G.S. 131E-105

. Information released to the Department shall be limited to information reasonably necessary and relevant to the Department’s investigation of compliance with Part 1 of Article 6 of this Chapter. Information released to the Department retains its confidentiality and is not subject to discovery or use in any civil action as provided in this subsection. The Department shall keep the information confidential subject to this subsection.

Information that is confidential and is not subject to discovery or use in civil actions under this subsection may be released to an occupational licensing board having jurisdiction over the license of an individual involved in an incident that is under review or investigation by the advisory committee. Information released to the occupational licensing board shall be limited to information reasonably necessary and relevant to an investigation being conducted by the licensing board pertaining to the individual’s involvement in the incident under review by the advisory committee. Information released to an occupational licensing board retains its confidentiality and is not subject to discovery or use in any civil action as provided in this subsection. The occupational licensing board shall keep the information confidential subject to this subsection.

Duties. — The advisory committee shall do the following:

Assess the nursing home’s pharmaceutical management system, including its prescribing, distribution, administration policies, procedures, and practices and identify areas at high risk for medication-related errors.

Review the nursing home’s pharmaceutical management goals and respond accordingly to ensure that these goals are being met.

Review, investigate, and respond to nursing home incident reports, deficiencies cited by licensing or credentialing agencies, and resident grievances that involve actual or potential medication-related errors.

Identify goals and recommendations to implement best practices and procedures, including risk reduction technology, to improve patient safety by reducing the risk of medication-related errors.

Develop recommendations to establish a mandatory, nonpunitive, confidential reporting system within the nursing home of actual and potential medication-related errors.

Develop specifications for drug dispensing and administration documentation procedures to ensure compliance with federal and State law, including the North Carolina Nursing Practice Act.

Develop specifications for self-administration of drugs by qualified patients in accordance with law, including recommendations for assessment procedures that identify patients who may be qualified to self-administer their medications.

Penalty. — The Department may take adverse action against the license of a nursing home upon a finding that the nursing home has failed to comply with this section,

G.S. 131E-128.2

, 131E-128.3, or 131E-128.4.

History.

2003-393, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 12G.2(a), (b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2003-393, s. 3, made this section effective January 1, 2004.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12G.2(a), (b). effective July 1, 2013, deleted “and

G.S. 131E-128.5

” following “G.S. 131E-128.2” in subsection (e); and, in subsection (g), deleted “or 131E-128.5” following “131E-128.4,” and made a related minor stylistic change.

§ 131E-128.2.
Nursing home quality assurance committee; duties related to medication error prevention.

Every nursing home administrator shall ensure that the nursing home quality assurance committee develops and implements appropriate measures to minimize the risk of actual and potential medication-related errors, including the measures listed in this section. The design and implementation of the measures shall be based upon recommendations of the medication management advisory committee and shall:

Increase awareness and education of the patient and family members about all medications that the patient is using, both prescription and over-the-counter, including dietary supplements.

Increase prescription legibility.

Minimize confusion in prescription drug labeling and packaging, including unit dose packaging.

Develop a confidential and nonpunitive process for internal reporting of actual and potential medication-related errors.

To the extent practicable, implement proven medication safety practices, including the use of automated drug ordering and dispensing systems.

Educate facility staff engaged in medication administration activities on similar-sounding drug names.

Implement a system to accurately identify recipients before any drug is administered.

Implement policies and procedures designed to improve accuracy in medication administration and in documentation by properly authorized individuals, in accordance with prescribed orders and stop order policies.

Implement policies and procedures for patient self-administration of medication.

Investigate and analyze the frequency and root causes of general categories and specific types of actual or potential medication-related errors.

Develop recommendations for plans of action to correct identified deficiencies in the facility’s pharmaceutical management practices.

History.

2003-393, s. 1.

§ 131E-128.3.
Staff orientation on medication error prevention.

The nursing home administrator shall ensure that the nursing home provide a minimum of one hour of education and training in the prevention of actual or potential medication-related errors. This training shall be provided upon orientation and annually thereafter to all nonphysician personnel involved in direct patient care. The content of the training shall include at least the following:

General information relevant to the administration of medications including terminology, procedures, routes of medication administration, potential side effects, and adverse reactions.

Additional instruction on categories of medication pertaining to the specific needs of the patient receiving the medication.

The facility’s policy and procedures regarding its medication administration system.

How to assist patients with safe and accurate self-administration of medication, where appropriate.

Identifying and reporting actual and potential medication-related errors.

History.

2003-393, s. 1.